Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-691
Money; disposition.

The money realized from any levy made pursuant to section 77-689 shall be first applied by the Tax Commissioner toward payment of any costs incurred by virtue of such levy and next to the payment of such taxes, interest, and penalties. Any balance remaining shall then be paid over to the car line company entitled thereto.

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 76;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 216;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 85;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 42.